Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 10. Conservation and Development
Executive Order No. 10-42
(No. 12-17) [Vermont Climate Action Commission.

WHEREAS, through the 2016 Comprehensive Energy Plan, Vermont has committed to reducing greenhouse gas emissions by at least forty percent below 1990 levels by 2030 and eighty to ninety five percent below 1990 levels by 2050, and meeting ninety percent
of energy needs from renewable sources by 2050; and

WHEREAS, while significant progress has been made in reducing greenhouse gas emissions from the electricity sector through the partnership of the nine Northeast states that form the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative, comparable emissions reductions from
other sectors that contribute to more than ninety percent of greenhouse gas emissions in Vermont have not been achieved; and

WHEREAS, the State must work with a range of perspectives to develop a strategy to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and combat climate change that addresses these fundamental principles:

• solutions that reduce greenhouse gas emissions must spur economic activity, inspire and grow Vermont businesses, and put Vermonters on a path to affordability;

• the development of solutions must engage all Vermonters, so no individual or group of Vermonters is unduly burdened; and

• programs developed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions must collectively provide solutions for all Vermonters to reduce their carbon impact and save money.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby re-affirm Vermont’s commitment to reduce greenhouse gas emissions from all sectors of the economy and create the Vermont Climate Action
Commission to develop effective actions to meet those goals:

Commission Charge and Process.

The Commission shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

A.
By July 31, 2018, draft and recommend, for the Governor’s consideration, an action plan aimed at reaching the State’s renewable energy and greenhouse gas reduction goals while driving economic growth, setting Vermonters
on a path to affordability, and ensuring effective energy transition options exist for all Vermonters. The plan shall include specific actions recommended by the Commission to:

(i)
implement the long-term policy goals of the Vermont Comprehensive Energy Plan;

(ii)
reduce greenhouse gas emissions from all sectors, including those sectors not addressed in the Vermont Comprehensive Energy Plan; and

(iii)
stimulate or support investment in the development of innovative technologies and strategies that have significant potential to reduce greenhouse emissions in Vermont.

B.
Hold public scoping sessions to inform the recommendations of the action plan;

C.
On or before December 31, 2017, evaluate existing State Executive Orders which are designed to address climate change issues and recommend, for the Governor’s consideration, updates, modifications or sunset provisions.

D.
Convene a Technical Advisory Group to provide additional expertise and analysis of technical issues that may be required to fulfill the Commission Charge. The Technical Advisory Group shall consist of persons available
to the Commission on an as-needed basis to provide expertise in climate science; emission quantification; public health; transportation; energy generation, transmission, and storage; energy markets; banking; insurance; regional
planning; building design and operation; and any other expertise the Commission deems appropriate.

Composition.

The Committee shall consist of twenty-one members, with representatives from the named sectors listed below to be appointed by the Governor:

A.
the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources or designee;

B.
the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development or designee;

C.
the Commissioner of the Department of Public Service or designee;

D.
the Secretary of the Agency of Transportation or designee;

E.
one representative from the Agriculture sector;

F.
one representative from the Clean Energy sector;

G.
one representative from the Commercial Hauling or Trucking sectors;

H.
one representative from the Construction or Development sectors;

I.
one representative from an Energy Utility;

J.
one representative from the Energy Efficiency sector;

K.
one representative from a statewide Environmental Organization;

L.
one representative from the Forestry or Forest Products sectors;

M.
one representative from the Fuels sector;

N.
one representative from Local Government;

O.
one representative from the Manufacturing sector;

P.
one representative from the Research and Development sector;

Q.
one representative from the Rural Development sector;

R.
one representative from a Small Business;

S.
one representative from the Transportation Demand Management sector;

T.
one representative from the Vermont Community Action Partnership; and

U.
one Vermont student currently enrolled at a Vermont academic institution.

Chair of Commission and Commission Support.

The Chair of the Commission shall be the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources or designee. The Chair shall name a Co-Chair and may name an Executive Committee to assist him or her with managing the Commission Charge.

The Commission shall have the administrative, technical, and legal assistance of the Agency of Natural Resources. The Commission shall have technical assistance from the Department of Public Service; the Agency of Commerce and Community Development; and
the Agency of Transportation.

Authority of Agencies.

This Executive Order shall not limit the independent authority of a State agency to promulgate regulations related to greenhouse gas emissions and climate change in Vermont.

V

Effective Date.

This Executive Order supersedes and replaces Executive Order No. 15-12 dated December 28, 2012 (codified as Executive Order 10-40). This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated July 20, 2017.

Executive Order No. 10-43
(No. 13-17) [Interagency Committee on Chemical Management.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 10-46 (codified as Executive Order No. 02-19) dated March 11, 2019.

Executive Order No. 10-44
(No. 01-18) [Temporary Suspension of Heating Oil Content Requirements Due to Inadequate Supply]

WHEREAS, the State has suffered an extended period of extreme cold weather which has resulted in depleted heating fuel oil supplies posing risks to the life and safety of Vermonters, particularly our most vulnerable residents; and

WHEREAS, in consultation with the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources (Secretary) and the Commissioner of Public Service (Commissioner), I have determined that meeting the sulphur content limitations set forth in

10 V.S.A. § 585(b)
is not feasible due to an inadequate supply of heating oil available to Essex, Caledonia, Orange, Windsor and Windham Counties; and

WHEREAS, a temporary suspension of State heating oil sulphur content limitations would provide additional flexibility for companies that deliver heating oil in both New Hampshire and Vermont to purchase fuel from either Maine or New Hampshire.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 585(e)
, hereby suspend the implementation and enforcement of the sulphur content limitations for heating oil sold within the State for residential, commercial or industrial uses, including space and water heating, effective
immediately and to extend no further than January 24, 2018 or such earlier date as I may determine, in consultation with the Secretary and the Commissioner, that Vermonters are no longer at risk from inadequate supply.

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated January 10, 2018.

Executive Order No. 10-46
(No. 02-19) [Interagency Committee on Chemical Management; Process for Review of Chemical Recordkeeping and Reporting Requirements.

WHEREAS, Vermonters may be exposed to harmful chemicals in drinking water, food supplies, outdoor and indoor air, and in consumer products; and

WHEREAS, the State does not have sufficient information-use, volume, location and toxicity, and potential risks -about chemicals present in the State; and

WHEREAS, sufficient information about chemicals present in the State is critical to the State’s ability to effectively respond to emergencies and threats to human health posed by harmful chemicals; ensure the safety of first responders; prioritize limited
resources to address those chemicals that pose the greatest risk to Vermonters; assist Vermont businesses with compliance with federal and State laws related to chemical reporting and management requirements; and provide information
to citizens about chemical use in the State; and

WHEREAS, Executive Order 13-17 of 2017 (2017 Order) established the Interagency Committee on Chemical Management (Committee) to evaluate chemical inventories in the State on an annual basis to identify potential risks to human health and the environment
from regulated and unregulated chemicals in the State; and

WHEREAS, the 2017 Order requires the Committee to make recommendations to the Governor as to any necessary legislative or regulatory actions to reduce risks to Vermonters from unsafe chemicals on December 15, 2018, and requires a report to include, among
other items, any recommended legislative or regulatory actions to reduce risks to human health and the environment from regulated and unregulated chemicals of emerging concern; and

WHEREAS, the Committee met routinely and consulted with a citizen advisory panel on proposed recommendations for legislative or regulatory actions to reduce risks from chemicals, including the development of a general framework to be used by the Committee
to review and analyze risks posed by chemicals in order to consider appropriate changes to applicable recordkeeping, reporting, and other technical requirements; and

WHEREAS, the Committee submitted a report to the Governor on December 15, 2018. The report included recommendations for the establishment of a more specific process for coordinated State review of the risks to human health and the environment posed by
chemicals, classes of chemicals, or groupings of chemicals, including chemicals of emerging concern, that are used or proposed for use in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, the chemical review process recommended by the Committee will provide a consistent and deliberative framework for the State’s evaluation of chemicals and risks posed by those chemicals and will provide a transparent and coordinated approach to
identifying and implementing legislative, regulatory or other changes needed to protect Vermonters and the environment from such risks.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby amend and reaffirm the charge of the Interagency Committee on Chemical Management (Committee), as follows:

Composition; Chair of Committee.

The Committee shall consist of the following members:

A. the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources or designee;

B. the Secretary of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee;

C. the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development or designee;

D. the Commissioner of the Department of Health or designee;

E. the Commissioner of the Department of Labor or designee;

F. the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety or designee; and

G. the Secretary of the Agency of Digital Services or designee.

The Chair of the Committee shall be the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources or designee.

Committee Support and Authority.

The Committee shall have the administrative, technical, and legal assistance from the Agency of Natural Resources; Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets; the Department of Health; the Department of Public Safety; and the Department of Labor. The Committee
may obtain additional expertise and resources needed in the review of chemicals pursuant to this process.

The Committee may develop written procedures, guidance and other resources that are necessary and appropriate to implement this Executive Order. All procedures, guidance, and other resources developed shall be made available to the public.

The Committee may also hold public meetings to present information, take testimony or discuss and receive input on nominations for chemical review, technical report recommendations or other appropriate topics.

Committee Charge and Process.

The Committee shall make recommendations to the Governor, after consultation with a citizen advisory panel, to improve overall review and management of regulated and unregulated chemicals in the State and to improve and strengthen recordkeeping and reporting
and other regulatory requirements. To meet this charge, the Committee shall:

A. Convene a citizen advisory panel to provide input and expertise to the Committee. The panel shall consist of persons available to the Committee on an as-needed basis to the provide the following expertise:

Authority of Agencies.

This Executive Order shall not limit the independent authority of a State agency to promulgate regulations related to the reporting, use, distribution, manufacture or release of chemicals or take other actions under existing State or applicable federal
law.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall supersede and replace Executive Order 13-17 (codified as E.O. No. 10-43).

Dated March 11, 2019

One individual with expertise in toxicology;

One individual with expertise in environmental health;

One individual with expertise in maternal and child health;

One individual with expertise in industrial hygiene or occupational health;

One individual with expertise in human health and environmental risk assessment;

One individual with expertise in manufacturing products or processes located in Vermont and subject to Vermont recordkeeping and reporting requirements;

One individual with expertise in retail sales located in Vermont;

One individual associated with a small business located in Vermont and subject to Vermont recordkeeping and reporting requirements;

One individual associated with an academic institution with expertise in chemical management or chemical policy;

One individual with expertise in environmental law;

One individual with expertise in public policy, with a focus on chemical policy; and

One individual with expertise in development and administration of information reporting technology or databases.

B. Conduct a process to review and make recommendations to improve chemical management through changes to chemical recordkeeping, reporting or other requirements, including any legislative or regulatory changes. That process shall consist of the following
steps:

(1) Nomination of Chemicals for Review.

Nominations may be made to the Committee to review a chemical, class of chemicals, or grouping of chemicals. Nominations may be made by the Committee, members of the citizens advisory panel, or the public. Nominations shall be submitted in writing to
the Committee Chair on a form to be developed by the Committee, and shall include, at a minimum and to the extent available, the following information and any supporting documentation related to the chemical or chemicals that
are the subject of the nomination:

a. use and risk of adverse exposure in the State;

b. information about the potential hazards or risks;

c. information related to releases to the environmental media (e.g., air, water, soil);

d. the extent to which the chemical is regulated by the State, the federal government, and/or other jurisdictions where the purpose of such regulation is to address the risks posed to human health or the environment; and

e. any other information that the Committee determines is necessary to evaluate a chemical’s use in the State and/or the risks to human health and the environment posed by the chemical in the State.

(2) Preliminary Committee Determination.

The Committee shall determine whether the information in a nomination warrants further technical review of the nominated chemical, class of chemicals, or grouping of chemicals. The Committee may require the submission of additional information prior to
making a determination. The Committee may prioritize its review of nominations, and may consider the availability of information, Committee resources, and/or other factors that may limit further review of a nomination in its
determination.

(3) Technical Team Review; Report.

Upon a determination of further technical review, the Committee shall establish a technical team to review the nominated chemical(s) and to make recommendations for changes to legislative or regulatory standards governing use of the chemical(s). The technical
team shall consist of Committee members and/or designated Committee member representatives with relevant knowledge and expertise of the nominated chemical(s) including regulation, relevant uses, and/or the risks to human health
and the environment posed by the chemical(s). The technical team may obtain additional expertise, as needed.

The technical team shall summarize its review and any recommendations in a written report. The report shall include the following information related to the chemical(s) nominated for review, as applicable and to the extent available:

a. Current and/or expected future uses of the chemical, including a summary of estimated quantities of the chemical used, managed, or stored in association with these uses. This shall include a description of any known uses (by type) and amounts used,
managed and/or stored in Vermont.

b. Toxicity information.

c. Routes of known and potential exposure.

d. Known and potential impacts to public health and the environment. This shall include impacts to occupational health, public safety, and emergency response readiness.

e. The status of applicable regulations, advisories, assessments, and/or other applicable information or data, developed by the State.

f. The status of applicable regulations, advisories, assessments, or other applicable information or data developed by other states, the federal government or other jurisdictions.

g. Recommendations for the development of legislative, regulatory, guidance or other changes that are appropriate to address risks posed to human health or the environment. Such recommendations may include proposals for the following or a combination
thereof:

i. use reduction and exposure reduction techniques;

ii. alternatives to use;

iii. adoption of recordkeeping and/or reporting requirements;

iv. adoption of technical standards or limitations of use;

v. additional information or technical review that may be needed;

vi. no further action;

vii. any other changes in regulation or policy that may appropriate to address risks posed to human health or the environment posed by the nominated chemical(s).

h. A description of the potential impact of each recommendation, including impacts to users of the chemical(s) in Vermont, agencies or other entities that have regulatory authority over the chemical(s), and the public.

(4) Committee Review of Technical Report; Findings.

The Committee shall review and make findings on a report submitted by a technical team. The Committee may prioritize its review of technical reports, and may consider the availability of information, Committee resources, and/or other factors that may
limit review of technical reports. The Committee may obtain additional expertise or require the submission of additional information prior to making findings on a report.

The Committee may propose additional recommendations, including recommendation for the collection of additional information or for further technical review. The Committee shall issue its findings and a proposal for any additional recommendations in writing.
The Committee’s findings shall be submitted to the technical team and the citizens advisory panel and shall be made public.

(5) Citizens Advisory Panel Review of Committee’s Findings.

The citizens advisory panel may review the findings of the Committee related to any technical report and may provide written comments to the Committee. The panel shall coordinate the review and submission of comments with the Committee prior to any final
Committee action on the report.

(6) Committee Determination on Technical Report Recommendations

The Committee shall approve or deny, in whole or in part, any recommendations in a technical report and shall issue a written decision including findings supporting the actions taken. The Committee shall consider any comments submitted by the citizens
advisory panel and the public and may address such comments in writing or in the Committee’s written decision. A copy of the Committee’s decision shall be made public and sent to the nominating entity, relevant executive agencies,
and any other applicable entities.

C. Coordinate appropriate State agencies to implement the recommendations in the Committee’s final report. Any recommendation for legislative modifications or any other recommendations shall be submitted to the Governor. A copy of any recommendations
shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of jurisdiction of the General Assembly.

D. Issue a report and make recommendations to the Governor as to any necessary legislative or regulatory actions to reduce risks to Vermonters from unsafe chemicals on December 15, 2020 and biennially thereafter or as needed based on the work of the Committee.
Copies of any reports shall be provided to the appropriate committees of jurisdiction of the General Assembly. The report shall include:

(1) a summary of chemical use in the State based on reported chemical inventories;

(2) a summary of identified risks to human health and the environment from reported chemical inventories;

(3) a summary of any change under federal statute or rule affecting the regulation of chemicals in the State; and

(4) recommended legislative or regulatory action to reduce risks to human health and the environment from regulated and unregulated chemicals of emerging concern.

Executive Order No. 10-47
(No. 08-19) [Brownfields Economic Revitalization Alliance Program.

WHEREAS, Vermont’s workforce has declined significantly since the great recession with fewer Vermonters working or looking for work while employers struggle to fill good jobs; and

WHEREAS, a majority of Vermont’s counties have not returned to pre-recession employment levels; and

WHEREAS, we must do more to ensure that all of Vermont’s villages, towns, cities and counties have the tools to strengthen their communities and expand economic opportunity; and

WHEREAS, economic and community development is a high priority for Vermont’s municipalities, employers and Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, Vermont has a number of abandoned, idled and underused industrial and commercial sites and facilities where redevelopment is difficult because of contamination (referred to as brownfields); and

WHEREAS, developers report complicated issues involved in brownfield redevelopment projects in areas where development priorities exist (i.e. designated downtowns) — including State and federal regulations and permitting requirements overseen by multiple
agencies, in addition to liability, lender requirements and other legal concerns — make them more expensive and complex to pursue and develop; and

WHEREAS, the Brownfields Economic Revitalization Alliance or “BERA” has successfully utilized technical support and funding from the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) for all of its pilot projects to date; and

WHEREAS, the EPA recognizes the importance of BERA and continues to provide technical support and funding for BERA pilot projects; and

WHEREAS, the BERA serves an essential function in coordinating and prioritizing the deployment of State and federal resources to assist and guide developers of properties facing environmental and permitting challenges in evaluating, planning, and mitigating
hazards; and

WHEREAS, for Vermont to expand its economy and attract employers, the Governor has identified the need for a coordinated, predictable and transparent process for brownfield redevelopment projects while also protecting public health, safety and the environment;
and

WHEREAS, in order to ensure effective and efficient planning related to hazard and environmental mitigation and permitting related to brownfields redevelopment there is a need for a “one-stop-shop” to assist landowners and developers with accessing State
and federal resources, navigating regulations and permitting requirements and planning and coordinating the redevelopment of these properties on behalf of the people of Vermont.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor do hereby formally constitute the Brownfields Economic Revitalization Alliance (“BERA”) Program, to coordinate, utilize and deploy all available
federal, State, private sector and volunteer and non-governmental agency resources, including funding, in the remediation, permitting and redevelopment coordination of BERA Program designated properties as follows:

BERA Program Governance.

The BERA Program Executive Committee shall receive, review and act on recommendations from the BERA Working Group to designate new BERA Program projects and review progress on existing BERA Program projects as needed, but not less frequently than semi-annually.

The BERA Program Executive Committee shall consist of three tiers of members, as follows:

Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD), the Agency of Natural Resources (ANR) and the Agency of Transportation (AOT).

Not more than 12 non-governmental members appointed by the Governor, to include leaders in community planning, environmental remediation, economic development and finance, housing and commercial real estate.

State program members to be identified by the BERA Program Executive Committee, to include program staff from ACCD, AOT, the Department of Environmental Conservation, the Department of Health and the Governor’s Office.

The BERA Program Executive Committee shall be chaired by the designated representative of the Department of Environmental Conservation Brownfields Program.

The BERA Program Executive Committee may, in its discretion, consult with federal government representatives, private sector professionals and volunteer and non-governmental organizations for information and advice on best practices.

The BERA Program Executive Committee shall provide an annual report to the Governor on the status of the Coordinated Project Plans.

BERA Working Groups Charge and Process.

The BERA Program Executive Committee shall, with respect to each designated redevelopment project, establish BERA Working Groups to support the BERA Program’s mission, drawing membership from any agency or department of State government to participate
in and coordinate planning, permitting and remediation activities as part of each brownfield redevelopment project. Any conflicts resulting from these cross-agency designations shall be resolved by the Governor’s Director of
Affordability and Economic Growth Initiatives.

A BERA Working Group shall meet at the call of the BERA Program Executive Committee Chair as needed but not less frequently than quarterly, and consist of program staff from ANR, ACCD and AOT. The focus of BERA Working Groups shall be to identify BERA
Project Team members and coordinate site characterization and project permitting and prioritize State and federal funding for remediation and redevelopment activities.

The BERA Working Groups shall update the BERA Program Executive Committee on each Coordinated Project Plan not less than semi-annually to ensure each identified State governmental participant fulfills and executes its respective responsibilities outlined
in the Plan.

BERA Project Teams.

A BERA Working Group shall designate a “Project Team” for each BERA Project to consist of stakeholders for that project such as State, federal, regional and local entities that can facilitate the successful completion of the designated redevelopment project.

•

Single Point of Contact:
The BERA Executive Committee Chair shall appoint a State BERA Project Team Lead from each BERA Working Group dedicated to be the point of contact for a BERA Project Team. The BERA Project Team Lead shall address
concerns related to the designated redevelopment project as well as challenges associated with the implementation of the Coordinated Project Plan, including coordination with the federal and State agencies responsible for resources,
regulation and permitting and work with other relevant cooperating federal, State and local agencies, private sector professionals and interested third parties as needed.

•

Coordinated Project Plan:
Each BERA Project Team Lead shall develop a Coordinated Project Plan (Plan) at the start of each redevelopment project. The Plan shall: 1) list the roles and responsibilities for all entities to provide resources,
perform environmental reviews or grant authorizations; 2) discuss a remediation strategy; 3) outline plans and a schedule for outreach, coordination and BERA project completion; 4) set a schedule for coordinated BERA Project
Team meetings; 5) identify funding opportunities and gaps; and 6) identify the point at which the BERA project is “complete,” signifying the end of BERA Working Group and BERA Project Team involvement. Assignments within the
Plan shall be based on functional capabilities and statutory responsibilities of each member of the BERA Project Team.

To make the Plan viable and fulfill the mission of the BERA Program, all State governmental participants must execute their assignments when called upon.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall expire October 1, 2025, unless extended by the Governor.

Dated October 9, 2019

Executive Order No. 10-48
(No. 04-20) [Promoting and Providing Regulatory Certainty for Recreational Trails.

WHEREAS, Vermont’s landscape of forests, farms and compact downtowns and village centers and their associated outdoor recreation opportunities are major reasons why people visit and live in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, in Vermont, outdoor recreation accounts for 34,000 direct jobs and $2.5 billion in consumer spending; and

WHEREAS, our natural, cultural and physical recreation assets can and should be leveraged to sustain, grow and drive economic development in all sectors of Vermont’s economy with particular attention to the segment that includes outdoor recreation industry
businesses that are most closely aligned with the State’s outdoor recreation brand; and

WHEREAS, those recreation assets must be wisely managed and strengthened, not only to grow the economic development potential of this sector, but to sustain and enhance the value of the Vermont brand, the experience of visitors to Vermont and Vermonters’
quality of life; and

WHEREAS, outdoor recreation is critically important to the physical and mental health and wellness of Vermonters especially during the COVID-19 pandemic through exercise in the Vermont environment in a way that promotes our public health objectives; and

WHEREAS, Vermont Natural Resources Board Rule 71(A) clarifies that when a property owner authorizes a trail to be located on their property, and an Act 250 permit is required for that trail system, Act 250 jurisdiction only applies to that trail corridor;
and

WHEREAS, the public would benefit from additional clarity with respect to the manner in which recreational trails are regulated through Act 250.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, and in furtherance of promoting outdoor recreation and the rural economy, do hereby order and direct as follows:

The Chair of the NRB shall clarify through guidance or rulemaking:

A.
That the jurisdictional trigger for trails enrolled in the Vermont Trail System is the jurisdictional trigger that applies to the construction of improvements for municipal, county, and state purposes in

10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)
(v). (Meaning a VTS trail project will require 10 acres or more of actual land disturbance to trigger Act 250 jurisdiction, regardless the size of the parcel(s) the trail may cross).

B.
That the involved land for determining jurisdiction over trails enrolled in the Vermont Trail System includes only those portions of any tract or tracts of land to be physically altered or upon which construction
of improvements will occur as more fully described in Act 250 Rule 2(C)(5)(b). (Meaning land not used as a part of the VTS trail improvements will not be considered when determining whether a VTS trail project triggers Act
250 jurisdiction).

C.
That once Act 250 jurisdiction is triggered, that jurisdiction only extends to the trail corridor and to any area directly or indirectly impacted by the construction, operation, or maintenance of the trail corridor.
(Meaning when Act 250 asserts jurisdiction over a VTS trail project, jurisdiction will only apply to the trail corridor and will in no way restrict or encumber lands outside the trail corridor on the parcel(s) the trail may
cross).

Recommendations for Future Improvements to Recreational Trail Oversight.

On or before March 1, 2021, the Commissioner of Forests, Parks, and Recreation shall make recommendations for an alternative, best-management-practices-driven program for the oversight of planning, construction, use, and maintenance of recreational trails
in the Vermont Trails System administered by the Agency of Natural Resources. These recommendations should also provide applicants clarity on how recreational trails can be constructed and operated in a manner that does not
result in an undue or adverse impact to the human or natural communities where they are located. The report shall include recommendations for revisions to 10 V.S.A. chapter 20, including revisions to mapping, legislative authority
to administer the program, potential funding sources, staffing needs, and whether to include other recreational trails. The recommendations should include any proposed changes to legislation to promote the construction and
operation of trails in an environmentally protective manner. The Agency of Natural Resources shall consult with stakeholders including the Vermont Trails and Greenways Council in developing recommendations.

Suspension of Proceedings that Address Act 250 Jurisdiction.

Any executive branch litigant or tribunal shall take all reasonable steps to delay a final decision in any proceeding addressing Act 250 jurisdiction until the steps identified in this Executive Order take effect.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated October 5, 2020